Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 187A-15 of Title 73, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In addition to any other authorization provided by law, the
Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority is authorized to utilize
available funds from the Legacy Capital Financing Fund created by
Section 187B of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, in the amount of
Twenty-one Million Two Hundred Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($21,215,000.00) for the benefit of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation to:

1. Construct, refurbish, or expand the Forensic Science Center;
and
2. Acquire, construct, or refurbish needed warehouse
facilities.
B. LCF Recapitalization Payments shall be made related to the
distribution of proceeds provided in subsection A of this section,
in accordance with the provisions of the Legacy Capital Financing
Act, provided that notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph b
of paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 187B of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, such LCF Recapitalization Payments shall begin no
later than the month of May of the fiscal year in which subsection A
of this section becomes law.
C. The Authority may distribute funds authorized pursuant to
subsection A of this section in one or more tranches.
D. The Authority may enter memoranda of understanding with
agencies, departments, and subdivisions of the state as needed, to
facilitate the provisions of this act, provided that such memoranda
of understanding do not constitute a legal obligation of the State
of Oklahoma or impede the administration of the provisions of the
Legacy Capital Financing Act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 391, O.S.L.
2024 (73 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 187A-11), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 187A-11. A. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority is
authorized to utilize available funds from the Legacy Capital
Financing Fund created by Section 187B of Title 73 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title, in the amount of Twenty-seven Million Five
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($27,500,000.00) for the benefit of the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to construct, refurbish, or
expand the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation headquarters and
related facilities, which shall be designated the Harvey Pratt
Building.
B. LCF Recapitalization Payments shall be made related to the
distribution of proceeds provided in subsection A of this section,
in accordance with the provisions of the Legacy Capital Financing
Act, provided that notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph b
ENR. H. B. NO. 4056 Page 2

of paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 187B of this title, such
LCF Recapitalization Payments shall begin no later than thirty (30)
days from the enactment of this act.
C. The Authority may distribute funds authorized pursuant to
subsection A of this section in one or more tranches.
D. The Authority may enter memoranda of understanding with
agencies, departments, and subdivisions of the state as needed, to
facilitate the provisions of this act, provided that such memoranda
of understanding do not constitute a legal obligation of the State
of Oklahoma or impede the administration of the provisions of the
Legacy Capital Financing Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4056 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4056 Page 4